District of Columbia statutes.
32-510

Enforcement by civil action.

(a)

Subject to the provisions in subsection (b) of this section, an employee or the Mayor may bring a civil action against any employer to enforce the provisions of this chapter in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(b)

No civil action may be commenced more than 1 year after the occurrence or discovery of the alleged violation of this chapter.

(c)

If a court determines that an employer violated any provision of this chapter, the damages provision prescribed in § 32-509(b)(6) and § 32-509(b)(7) shall apply.

History

Oct. 3, 1990, D.C. Law 8-181, § 11, 37 DCR 5043
July 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-143, § 2, 41 DCR 3059

Section References

This section is referenced in § 32-509.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1310.